Hawaii statutes.
§467-21 The real estate commission has
standing in court. When the real estate commission receives notice, as
provided in section 467-18(a), the commission may enter an appearance, file an
answer, appear at the court hearing, defend the action, or take whatever other
action it deems appropriate on behalf and in the name of the defendant, and
take recourse through any appropriate method of review on behalf of, and in the
name of, the defendant. The commission or its legal representative shall be
served with all pleadings in an action which may result in a recovery from the
real estate recovery fund.

Settlement of any claim against the real estate
recovery fund may be made only with the agreement of a majority of the
commission that settlement is in the best interest of the real estate recovery
fund. [L 1967, c 187, pt of §1; HRS §467-21; am L 1972, c 51, §1c; am L 1982, c
204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1984, c 121, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next